Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 3

Division of Arkansas Heritage

25-3-101. Legislative intent — Construction.

The General Assembly declares that this act is necessary:

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for an orderly transfer of powers, duties, and functions of the various state programs or agencies to the Division of Arkansas Heritage with a minimum of disruption of governmental services and functions and with a minimum of expense.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 1001, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-923n, 5-926; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5702.

25-3-102. Creation — Director — Organization — Personnel.

There is created a Division of Arkansas Heritage.

(1)The executive head of the division shall be the Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage.

The director shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

The director, with the advice and consent of the Governor and the secretary, shall appoint the heads of each of the programs and agencies of the division. All other personnel of the division shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the director. However, nothing in this section shall be so construed as to reduce any right which an employee of the division shall have under any civil service or merit system.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-923; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5703.

25-3-103. [Repealed.]

There is established an Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee whose members shall consist of:

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, persons appointed to the committee by the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve terms of three (3) years.

At the first meeting of the committee after the effective date of this act, members appointed to the committee by the Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, or President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall draw lots to stagger terms so that:

History.

Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-925; Acts 2011, No. 896, § 3; 2017, No. 707, §
287; 2019, No. 910, § 5704.

25-3-105. Fees for publications, seminars, etc.

The Division of Arkansas Heritage through the Central Administration Division or any successor division is authorized to establish and impose reasonable fees to recover costs incurred in the preparation and distribution of educational published materials and in holding workshops and seminars and costs of other services rendered.

Funds derived from the fees shall be deposited in a bank account to be used to defray the initial costs of publishing additional educational publications and holding workshops and seminars.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 346, § 39; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-923.2; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5705.

25-3-106. Publication Development and Resale Revolving Fund.

There is established a fund to be known as the “Publication Development and Resale Revolving Fund” for the Division of Arkansas Heritage. This fund shall be located in the Central Administration Division of the Division of Arkansas Heritage and shall be managed by the Central Administration Division for the benefit of the various agencies located within the Division of Arkansas Heritage. This fund shall be a revolving fund.

Income derived from the sale of publications shall be deposited in the fund to be used to develop and purchase additional publications for resale.

Any funds remaining in the account from which the fund derives its support at the end of each fiscal year shall carry forward and be made available for the use prescribed in this section during the succeeding fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 346, § 41; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-923.4; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5706.

25-3-107. [Repealed.]

In addition to any other rights, powers, functions, and duties granted by law to the Division of Arkansas Heritage, the division is hereby authorized to promote and cooperate in the establishment of a heritage foundation under the Arkansas nonprofit corporation law, to share resources and facilities with the foundation, and to accept support and assistance in the form of money, property, or otherwise from the foundation to be used to preserve and promote the heritage of the state.

If a heritage foundation is established and the division shares resources or facilities with the foundation or accepts support and assistance from the foundation, the foundation shall annually file a report with the Governor, the Legislative Council, and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee showing the amount and source of all gifts, grants, and donations of money or property received by the foundation and all expenditures or other dispositions of money or property by the foundation during the preceding year.

On or before July 1 of each fiscal year, the Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage shall submit a plan to the Legislative Council reflecting the proposed uses of private funds for the ensuing fiscal year for its review and comment. No person over whom the division has day-to-day managerial control shall receive compensation or remuneration from funds not in the State Treasury.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.) No. 9, §§ 49-51; 2019, No. 910, § 5707.

25-3-109. [Repealed.]

25-4-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Arkansas Information Systems Act of 1997”.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1401; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 1.

25-4-102. Legislative findings and declaration of intent.

The General Assembly finds and declares information and information resources to be strategic assets of the State of Arkansas and that procedures must be established to ensure that:

Information resources are used in an efficient manner;

Resources of the Division of Information Systems are used unless an exception is authorized;

Information is administered and shared, consistent with requirements for security, privacy, and confidentiality;

Information technology acquisitions meet state needs and are consistent with coordinated efforts to maximize standardization and cost effectiveness;

State officials have timely access to information in useful forms; and

The division complies with applicable state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions.

The General Assembly further declares its intent to create a state agency division to:

Provide design and management services for the state's core information technology infrastructures;

Provide information technology services;

Implement appropriate technologies to exchange and share information; and

Develop technical standards and specifications and provide technical leadership and guidance to support the state's enterprise architecture.

It is also the intent of the General Assembly that the division achieve certain objectives that will better support information technology utilization by other state agencies. These objectives are to:

Implement increased capabilities for communication and exchange of information; and

Develop and publish mechanisms for more timely acquisition of information technology.

The General Assembly further finds and determines that:

Information technology services are readily available in the private sector;

The public interest would be well served by competition for the provision of such services to the state;

Public-private partnerships or joint ventures for the provision of such services may be appropriate in certain instances; and

Emphasis will be given to encouraging and enabling competition among:

Suppliers of such services whenever possible in the administration of this chapter; and

Women-owned and minority-owned suppliers of such services whenever possible in the administration of this chapter.

The division shall consider in the development of the division plan and the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology shall emphasize in its recommendations and policies the availability in the private sector of information technology resources upon a competitive bid basis with a view to assuring the state of the highest reasonable quality of resources at the lowest reasonable cost.

In exercising its authority under § 25-4-105, the division shall competitively procure information technology except as provided in this subsection.

The division is not authorized by § 25-4-105 to provide information technology services, including telecommunications and broadband services, to the general public, other than nongovernmental first responder entities, in competition with private sector telecommunications and cable communications providers.

Customers of the division are not authorized to use information technology facilities and services provided by the division to provide telecommunications and broadband services to the general public in competition with private sector telecommunications and cable communications providers.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted “subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” following “architecture” in (b)(4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Resources of the Division of Information Systems” for “Departmental resources” in (a)(2); substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a)(6); inserted “division” in the introductory language of (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in the introductory language of (c), twice in (d)(2), and throughout (e).

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1417; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 2; 2001, No. 1722, § 1; 2005, No. 1999, § 1; 2007, No. 751, § 10; 2009, No. 648, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6255-6260.

25-4-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Application” means a separately identifiable and interrelated set of information technology resources that allows information processing to support specifically defined objectives;

“Chief Technology Officer” means the Director of the Division of Information Systems;

“Core information technology infrastructure” means the state data, state network and application interfaces, state security, and disaster recovery;

“Customer” means a state agency, other governmental entity, or nongovernmental first responder entity that purchases or uses services under this chapter;

“Equipment” means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities used in information processing, including computers, word processors, terminals, telephones, cables, software, and related services;

“Information processing” means the electronic capture, collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;

“Information technology” means any component related to information processing and wired and wireless telecommunications, including data processing and telecommunications hardware, software, services, planning, personnel, facilities, and training;

“Information technology resources” means the procedures, equipment, and software that are designed, built, operated, and maintained to collect, record, process, store, retrieve, display, and transmit information, and the associated personnel, including consultants and contractors;

“Network infrastructure” means the shared portions of the state's telecommunications transmission facilities, including all transmission lines and all associated equipment and software components necessary for the management and control of the state network;

“Nongovernmental first responder entity” means state and law enforcement personnel, fire department personnel, and emergency medical personnel who will be deployed to bioterrorism attacks, terrorist attacks, catastrophic or natural disasters, and other emergencies;

“Other governmental entities” means state-elected constitutional officers and their staffs, the Supreme Court and the Administrative Office of the Courts, the General Assembly or its committees or staffs, the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the federal government, cities, counties, municipalities, public school districts, and other publicly funded governmental entities;

“Project” means a program to apply information technology resources to functions within or among elements of a state agency that ideally is characterized by well-defined parameters, specific objectives, common benefits, planned activities, a scheduled completion date, and an established budget with a specified source of funding;

“Project management” means principles, practices, and techniques applied to lead projects and teams and the control of project schedules, costs, and performance risks with the goal of satisfying customers' requirements;

“Public instrumentality” means any statutorily created entity charged with the responsibility of providing information or services through the use of information technology;

“State agencies” means all state departments, boards, and commissions but shall not include the Office of the Arkansas Lottery, the elected constitutional officers and their staffs, the General Assembly and its committees and staffs, or the Supreme Court and the Administrative Office of the Courts, and public institutions of higher education with respect to academic, research, health care, and existing information technology applications and underlying support therefor;

“State enterprise architecture” means a description of the elements of business processes and supporting technologies, policies, standards, procedures, solutions, and infrastructures that:

Makes up an enterprise; and

Documents how the components described in this subdivision (16) relate to one another, and the principles that govern their design and evolution over time;

“Telecommunications” means all forms of communications devices and transport media for the conveyance by electronic or electrical means of voice, words, data, signals, or images; and

“Working group” means a group of subject matter experts convened for the purpose of collaborating and devising strategies.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 648 deleted (5), and redesignated the subsequent subdivisions accordingly; inserted “and other publicly funded governmental entities” in (12); rewrote (16); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1405 inserted “the Arkansas Lottery Commission” in (15).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Office of the Arkansas Lottery” for “Arkansas Lottery Commission” in (15).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (11).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Information Systems” for “Director of the Department of Information Systems” in (2).

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1402; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 3; 2001, No. 1722, § 2; 2005, No. 1999, § 2; 2007, No. 751, § 11; 2009, No. 648, § 2; 2009, No. 1405, § 51; 2015, No. 218, § 29; 2017, No. 707, §
288; 2019, No. 910, § 6261.